Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.013

Code reviser defined.

Code reviser shall mean any lawyer or law publisher employing competent lawyers, each deemed by the committee to be qualified to compile the statutory law of the state of Washington as enacted by the legislature into a code or compilation of laws by title, chapter and section, without substantive change or alteration of purpose or intent.

[ 1951 c 157 s 6.]